Tennessee, session 114, HB2385.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF TENNESSEE:
SECTION 1. Tennessee Code Annotated, Section 7-82-710(a)(1), is amended by
deleting the subdivision and substituting:
Has an existing gravity sewer line located on or adjacent to the owner's property;
and
SECTION 2. This act takes effect upon becoming a law, the public welfare requiring it.
HB2385
011979
- 1 -